Maryland, session 2025, SB0367.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Health – General
15–103.
(a) (1) The Secretary shall administer the Maryland Medical Assistance
Program.
(2) The Program:
(xxiii) Beginning on July 1, 2025, shall provide, subject to the
limitations of the State budget, and as permitted by federal law, coverage for biomarker
testing in accordance with § 15–859 of the Insurance Article; [and]
(xxiv) Beginning on January 1, 2025, shall provide coverage for
prostheses in accordance with § 15–844 of the Insurance Article; AND
(XXV) BEGINNING ON JULY 1, 2026, SHALL PROVIDE, SUBJECT TO
FEDERAL APPROVAL AND LIMITATIONS OF THE STATE BUDGET, SUPPORTIVE
HOUSING AND HEALTH SERVICES FOR INDIVIDUALS AND FAMILIES IN ACCORDANCE
WITH § 15–141.6 OF THIS SUBTITLE.
15–141.6.

SENATE BILL 367 3
(A) (1) IN THIS SECTION THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.
(2) “CERTIFIED SUPPORTIVE HOUSING AND HEALTH SERVICES
PROFESSIONAL” MEANS AN INDIVIDUAL WHO MEETS THE REQUIREMENTS OF
SUBSECTION (C) OF THIS SECTION.
(3) “CHRONIC HOMELESSNESS” MEANS LACKING A FIXED, REGULAR,
AND ADEQUATE NIGHTTIME RESIDENCE FOR AT LEAST 1 YEAR OR MORE THAN
TWICE IN A 1–YEAR PERIOD.
(4) “HOMELESSNESS” MEANS A CONDITION WHERE AN INDIVIDUAL
OR FAMILY LACKS A FIXED, REGULAR, AND ADEQUATE NIGHTTIME RESIDENCE.
(5) “HOUSING INSTABILITY” MEANS CHALLENGES THAT MAKE IT
DIFFICULT FOR AN INDIVIDUAL OR FAMILY TO PAY RENT, MAINTAIN HOUSING, OR
HAVE A STABLE HOME.
(6) “SUPPORTIVE HOUSING” MEANS LONG–TERM HOUSING WITH
INTEGRATED, INDIVIDUALIZED SUPPORTIVE SERVICES DESIGNED TO ASSIST AN
INDIVIDUAL FACING CHRONIC HOMELESSNESS OR HOUSING INSTABILITY.
(7) (I) “SUPPORTIVE HOUSING AND HEALTH SERVICES” MEANS
HOUSING IN WHICH ASSISTANCE, SUCH AS LONG–TERM LEASING OR RENTAL
ASSISTANCE, AND OTHER SUPPORTIVE SERVICES ARE PROVIDED TO
ASSIST INDIVIDUALS AND HOUSEHOLDS TO ACHIEVE HOUSING STABILITY.
(II) “SUPPORTIVE HOUSING AND HEALTH SERVICES”
INCLUDES:
1. ASSISTANCE WITH COMMUNITY TRANSITION COSTS;
2. HOME ACCESSIBILITY MODIFICATIONS;
3. HOUSING AND TENANCY SUPPORTS; AND
4. WRAPAROUND SUPPORTIVE SERVICES.
(8) “SUPPORTIVE HOUSING AND HEALTH SERVICES PROVIDER”
MEANS A FOR–PROFIT, NONPROFIT, PUBLIC, OR PRIVATE ENTITY THAT COMBINES
HOUSING AND HEALTH SERVICES TO ASSIST INDIVIDUALS WITH COMPLEX HEALTH,
MENTAL HEALTH, OR SUBSTANCE USE ISSUES TO MAINTAIN STABLE HOUSING AND
RECEIVE HEALTH CARE.

SENATE BILL 367
(9) “WRAPAROUND SUPPORTIVE SERVICES” MEANS
INDIVIDUAL–CENTERED SERVICES THAT INCLUDE:
(I) CASE MANAGEMENT;
(II) HEALTH CARE;
(III) BEHAVIORAL SUPPORT;
(IV) EMPLOYMENT SERVICES; AND
(V) OTHER SERVICES NECESSARY TO MAINTAIN HOUSING AND
IMPROVE AN INDIVIDUAL’S HEALTH.
(B) THE PROGRAM SHALL PROVIDE SUPPORTIVE HOUSING AND HEALTH
SERVICES TO PROGRAM RECIPIENTS WHO:
(1) ARE EXPERIENCING HOMELESSNESS OR CHRONIC
HOMELESSNESS;
(2) REQUIRE INTENSIVE CASE MANAGEMENT;
(3) HAVE A CHRONIC HEALTH CONDITION OR ACUTE ILLNESS; AND
(4) REQUIRE ASSISTANCE WITH OBTAINING AND MAINTAINING
HOUSING AS A RESULT OF A DOCUMENTED MENTAL ILLNESS, SUBSTANCE USE
DISORDER, OR DISABILITY, AS INDICATED BY A NEED FOR ASSISTANCE WITH AT
LEAST ONE OF THE FOLLOWING:
(I) MOBILITY;
(II) DECISION MAKING;
(III) MANAGEMENT OF CHALLENGING BEHAVIORS; OR
(IV) AT LEAST ONE BASIC NEED SUCH AS SELF–CARE, BATHING,
OR CHANGING CLOTHES.
(C) AN INDIVIDUAL SEEKING CERTIFICATION AS A CERTIFIED SUPPORTIVE
HOUSING AND HEALTH SERVICES PROFESSIONAL SHALL:

SENATE BILL 367 5
(1) COMPLETE AN ACCREDITED TRAINING AND CERTIFICATION
PROGRAM FOR SUPPORTIVE HOUSING AND HEALTH SERVICES PROFESSIONALS,
APPROVED IN ACCORDANCE WITH SUBSECTION (D) OF THIS SECTION; AND
(2) MAINTAIN THE CERTIFICATION COMPLETED UNDER ITEM (1) OF
THIS SUBSECTION.
(D) ON OR BEFORE JANUARY 1, 2026, THE DEPARTMENT SHALL APPROVE
AT LEAST ONE ACCREDITED TRAINING AND CERTIFICATION PROGRAM FOR
CERTIFIED SUPPORTIVE HOUSING AND HEALTH SERVICES PROFESSIONALS THAT
INCLUDES:
(1) AT LEAST 35 HOURS OF INITIAL TRAINING; AND
(2) AT LEAST 6 HOURS OF CONTINUING EDUCATION EVERY 2 YEARS.
(E) AN ENTITY, INCLUDING A SUPPORTIVE HOUSING AND HEALTH SERVICES
PROVIDER, THAT EMPLOYS OR CONTRACTS WITH A CERTIFIED SUPPORTIVE
HOUSING AND HEALTH SERVICES PROFESSIONAL TO PROVIDE SUPPORTIVE
HOUSING AND HEALTH SERVICES SHALL:
(1) MAINTAIN DOCUMENTATION THAT THE CERTIFIED SUPPORTIVE
HOUSING AND HEALTH SERVICES PROFESSIONAL HAS MET THE REQUIREMENTS OF
SUBSECTION (C) OF THIS SECTION; AND
(2) ENSURE THAT THE CERTIFIED SUPPORTIVE HOUSING AND
HEALTH SERVICES PROFESSIONAL IS PROVIDING SUPPORTIVE HOUSING AND
HEALTH SERVICES IN COMPLIANCE WITH ANY APPLICABLE STANDARD OF CARE,
RULE, REGULATION, AND FEDERAL OR STATE LAW.
(F) THIS SECTION MAY NOT BE CONSTRUED TO ALTER THE SCOPE OF
PRACTICE FOR ANY HEALTH CARE PROFESSIONAL.
(G) (1) THE DEPARTMENT SHALL ESTABLISH A STAKEHOLDER ADVISORY
COMMITTEE TO ADVISE THE DEPARTMENT ON THE DEVELOPMENT OF
REGULATIONS AND PROCEDURES TO CARRY OUT THIS SECTION.
(2) THE STAKEHOLDER ADVISORY COMMITTEE SHALL CONSIST OF:
(I) THREE REPRESENTATIVES OF ORGANIZATIONS WITH
EXPERIENCE PROVIDING SUPPORTIVE HOUSING AND HEALTH SERVICES IN THE
STATE;

SENATE BILL 367
(II) ONE HOMELESS SERVICES PROVIDER; AND
(III) ANY OTHER MEMBER AS DETERMINED NECESSARY BY THE
DEPARTMENT.
(H) (1) THE SECRETARY SHALL ADOPT REGULATIONS TO CARRY OUT
THIS SECTION.
(2) THE SECRETARY SHALL CONSIDER THE RECOMMENDATIONS OF
THE STAKEHOLDER ADVISORY COMMITTEE WHEN DEVELOPING THE REGULATIONS
REQUIRED UNDER THIS SUBSECTION.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That, on or before October 1, 2025,
the Maryland Department of Health shall apply to the Centers for Medicare and Medicaid
Services for a waiver to provide supportive housing and health services under the Maryland
Medical Assistance Program.
SECTION 3. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That Section 1 of this Act shall take
effect on the date that the waiver applied for in accordance with Section 2 of this Act is
approved. If the waiver is not approved, Section 1 of this Act shall be null and void without
the necessity of further action by the General Assembly. The Maryland Department of
Health, within 5 days after receiving approval or denial of the waiver, shall forward a copy
of the notice to the Department of Legislative Services.
SECTION 4. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That, subject to Section 3 of this
Act, this Act shall take effect July 1, 2025.